Hawaii statutes.
§431:10C-203 Rate filings. The
commissioner may accept from an advisory organization basic standards, manuals
of classification, territories, endorsements, forms, and other materials, not
dealing with rates, for reference filings by insurers. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2
as superseded by c 348, §17; am L 1989, c 207, §13; am L 1992, c 124, §4]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next